Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska18-2435
Director; removal; certificate of appointment; term; vacancy; expenses.

A director may be removed for any cause at any time by the governing body of the municipality for which such director acts or by the board pursuant to its bylaws. A certificate of the appointment or reappointment of any director shall be filed with the clerk of the municipality for which such director acts and such certificate shall be conclusive evidence of the due and proper appointment of such director. Each director appointed prior to August 7, 2020, shall serve for a term of three years or until his or her successor has been appointed and has qualified in the same manner as the original appointment. Beginning on August 7, 2020, each director shall serve for a term as established by the bylaws of the board. A director shall be eligible for reappointment upon the expiration of his or her term. A vacancy shall be filled for the balance of the unexpired term of the person who has ceased to hold office in the same manner as the original appointment. A director shall receive no compensation for his or her services but shall be entitled to the necessary expenses, including travel expenses, incurred in the discharge of his or her official duties, including mileage at the rate provided in section 81-1176 for state employees.

Laws 1981, LB 132, § 35;

Laws 1984, LB 686, § 2;

Laws 2020, LB858, § 7.